Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-364.09
Child support; withholding of earnings; priority.

Any order to withhold and transmit earnings shall have priority over any attachment, execution, garnishment, or wage assignment, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

Laws 1974, LB 1015, § 14.